Alaska statutes. Title 9. Code of Civil Procedure.
Article 6. Pleadings.

Sec. 09.50.390.
Nature of state interest.

A complaint or pleading naming the State of Alaska as a defendant must set out, with such particularity as reasonably available information will permit, the nature of the interest or lien of the state. In actions or suits involving liens of the state, the complaint or pleading must include the name and address, if known, of the person whose liability created the lien and, if a notice of the lien was recorded, the amount shown on the lien, the department of the state government involved, the recording district, and the book and page on which the lien was recorded or the serial number assigned to the lien by the recorder.

History.

(§ 1 ch 121 SLA 1968; am § 12 ch 35 SLA 2003)